South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3544.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-3-240. Members of the General Assembly may use athletic clubs or gymnasiums owned by a state or local agency, entity, commission, or institution without charge. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----